Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.127

Collegiate license plates.

"Collegiate license plates" means license plates that display a depiction of the name and mascot or symbol of a state university, regional university, or state college as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

[ 1994 c 194 s 1.]